Hawaii statutes.
[§539-3] Registration in beneficiary form;
applicable law. A security may be registered in beneficiary form if the
form is authorized by this or a similar statute of the state of organization of
the issuer or registering entity, the location of the registering entity's
principal office, the office of its transfer agent or its office making the
registration, or by this or a similar statute of the law of the state listed as
the owner's address at the time of registration. A registration governed by
the law of a jurisdiction in which this or similar legislation is not in force
or was not in force when a registration in beneficiary form was made is
nevertheless presumed to be valid and authorized as a matter of contract law.
[L 1998, c 63, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next